Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4009.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 37, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 37-111, to read: START_STATUTE37-111. State land department; data centers; thermal and nonthermal electric generating units; development; maps; posting A. Every ten years or earlier as determined necessary by the commissioner, the department shall develop or update both of the following: 1. a map that identifies the parcels of state lands that the commissioner deems are the highest and best locations for siting and developing computer data centers and data center facilities. The department shall cooperate and consult with members of the computer data center industry to develop the map. 2. A MAP THAT IDENTIFIES THE PARCELS OF STATE LANDS THAT THE COMMISSIONER DEEMS ARE THE HIGHEST AND BEST LOCATIONS FOR SITING AND DEVELOPING thermal and nonthermal electric generating units, including small modular reactors.  THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COOPERATE AND CONSULT WITH MEMBERS OF THE electric power generation and utility INDUSTRY TO DEVELOP THE MAP. b. The commissioner shall consider both maps developed pursuant to subsection A of this section when the commissioner creates the conceptual land use plans pursuant to section 37-331.03. c. The commissioner shall submit a copy of each map to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives and the secretary of state.  The department shall post each map on the department's website. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. State land department; implementation; applicability A. Not later than two years after the effective date of this act, the commissioner of the state land department shall develop, provide copies of and post the maps as required pursuant to section 37-111, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act. B. This act does not prohibit the state land department from processing any application for the disposition of state lands or for permits for data centers, thermal electric generating units or nonthermal electric generating units before the adoption of a map required by section 1 of this act.